Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 7
PUBLIC PROPERTY AND IMPROVEMENTS

31-15-701. Necessary buildings.

The governing body of each municipality has the power to erect and care for all necessary public buildings for the use of the municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1113, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to several former provisions of § 31-12-101 (19) as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

31-15-702. Streets and alleys.

The governing body of each municipality has the power:

To lay out, establish, open, alter, widen, extend, grade, pave, or otherwise improve streets, parks, and public grounds and vacate the same and to direct and regulate the planting of ornamental and shade trees in such streets, parks, and public grounds; to plant trees upon the same; to regulate the use of the same; to prevent and remove encroachments or obstructions upon the same; to provide for the lighting of the same; and to provide for the cleansing of the same;

To regulate the openings therein for the laying-out of gas or water mains and pipes, the building and repairing of sewers, tunnels, and drains, and the erecting of utility poles. Any company organized under the general laws of this state or any association of persons organized for the purpose of manufacturing energy to supply municipalities or the inhabitants thereof with the same has the right by consent of the governing body, but not without such consent, subject to existing rights, to erect factories and lay down pipes in the streets or alleys of any municipality in the state, subject to such regulations as any such municipality by ordinance may impose.

To regulate the use of sidewalks along the streets and alleys and all structures thereunder and to require the owner or occupant of any premises to keep the sidewalks, or along the same, free from snow and other obstructions;

To regulate and prevent the throwing or depositing of ashes, garbage, or any offensive matter in and to prevent any injury to any street, park, or public ground;

To provide for and regulate crosswalks, curbs, and gutters;

To regulate and prevent the use of streets, parks, and public grounds for signs, signposts, awnings, awning posts, and power and communications poles, and for posting handbills and advertisements; to regulate and prohibit the exhibition or carrying of banners, placards, advertisements, or handbills in the streets or public grounds or upon the sidewalks; and to regulate and prevent the flying of flags, banners, or signs across the streets or from houses;

To regulate traffic and sales upon the streets, sidewalks, and public places and to regulate the speed of vehicles, cars, and locomotives within the limits of the municipality;

To regulate the numbering of houses and lots and to name and change the name of any street or other public place;

To provide for the construction and maintenance of sidewalks, curbs, and gutters of such material and in such manner as shall be designated and to provide for paying the expenses thereof by special assessments upon the adjacent or abutting property, which assessments shall constitute a lien as provided in section 31-15-401 (1)(d)(I);

To grade, grade or gravel, or otherwise surface or improve streets and alleys and to assess the costs of such improvements upon the lots or lands adjacent to or abutting upon any street or alley or portion thereof so improved, which assessments shall constitute a lien as provided in section 31-15-401 (1)(d);

To grant, by ordinance and upon such terms and conditions as may be prescribed therein, to other municipalities the right-of-way through, over, across, and under streets and alleys for the purpose of laying, constructing, operating, maintaining, and repairing waterworks and all pipelines connected therewith;

To authorize the construction of mills and mill races, irrigating or mining ditches, and feeders on, through, or across the streets of the municipality at such places and under such restrictions as deemed proper.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1113, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

31-15-703. Improvements - petition - construction.

When the owners of sixty percent of the frontage of the lots or lands adjacent to or abutting upon any street or alley or designated portion thereof petition the governing body in writing to construct a sewer, including a storm sewer, in said street or alley or require sidewalks to be constructed along said street or alley or designated portion thereof, it is the duty of the governing body to order said improvement to be made, to assess the cost of said improvement against the lots or lands adjacent to or abutting upon said sidewalk, street, or alley so improved, and to collect the assessment as provided in sections 31-15-401 (1)(d) and 31-15-704.

When the governing body deems it necessary that any sewer, including a storm sewer, should be constructed, it shall construct the same, assess the cost thereof against the adjacent property, and collect the assessment as provided in sections 31-15-401 (1)(d) and 31-15-704. When the governing body deems it necessary that any portion of a sidewalk, curb, and gutter be constructed or repaired, it may, on its own motion, order the same to be done, and if not constructed or repaired by the owner upon notice, the municipality may construct or repair the same, assess the costs thereof against the adjacent property owner, and collect the assessment as provided in sections 31-15-401 (1)(d) and 31-15-704.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1114, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-15-302 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-15-704. Collection of assessments.

When the cost of any improvement provided for in sections 31-15-702 (1)(b) and 31-15-703 is assessed against the owners of adjacent or abutting property and the assessment is not paid within thirty days, the clerk shall certify said assessment to the treasurer of the county who shall extend said assessment upon his tax roll and collect it in the same manner as other taxes assessed upon said property.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1114, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-15-303 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-15-705. Construction of highway - petition - notice - election - tax.

Any municipality may aid in the construction and repair of any highway leading thereto by appropriating a portion of the highway tax belonging to said municipality, not exceeding fifty percent thereof annually, as provided in this section. When a petition signed by twenty of the registered electors of said municipality asking that the question of aiding in the construction or repair of any highway leading thereto be submitted to the registered electors thereof is presented to the governing body, the governing body immediately shall give notice of a special election. Said notice shall specify the date of such election, the particular highway proposed to be aided, and the proportion of the highway tax then levied and not expended or next thereafter to be levied to be appropriated. The election shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965". The question on the ballot or voting machine tabs shall be "Appropriation" or "No appropriation". If a majority of the votes polled are for appropriation, the governing body may aid in the construction and repair of said highway to the extent of the appropriation in the same manner as they otherwise would if said highway were within the municipal limits of said municipality. No part of such highway tax shall be expended more than two miles from the limits of such municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1114, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-103 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-15-706. Railroad track.

The governing body of each municipality has the power to grant the use of, or the right to lay down, any railroad track in any street of the municipality to any steam or street railroad company operating its cars, by any kind of mechanical motive power, only upon the written consent of the owners of the land representing more than one-half of the frontage of the street or so much thereof as is sought to be used for railroad purposes. No franchise shall be granted on that part of any street upon which any other company is operating cars without the written consent of a majority of the frontage owners in every block abutting the track already down upon said street.

The governing body of each municipality has the power to extend, by condemnation or otherwise, any street, alley, or highway over or across or to construct any sewer under or through any railroad track, right-of-way, or land of any railroad company within the corporate limits, but where no compensation is made to such railroad company, the municipality shall restore such railroad track, right-of-way, or land to its former state or in a sufficient manner not to have impaired its usefulness.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1115, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-101 (75) and (76) as it existed prior to 1975.

31-15-707. Municipal utilities.

The governing body of each municipality has the power:

To acquire waterworks, gasworks, and gas distribution systems for the distribution of gas of any kind or electric light and power works and distribution systems, or heating and cooling works and distribution systems for the distribution of heat and cooling obtained from geothermal resources, solar or wind energy, hydroelectric or renewable biomass resources, including waste and cogenerated heat, and all appurtenances necessary to any of said works or systems or to authorize the erection, ownership, operation, and maintenance of such works and systems by others. No such works or systems, except waterworks, shall be acquired or erected by a municipality until the question of acquiring or erecting the same is submitted at a regular or special election and approved in the manner provided for authorization of bonded indebtedness by section 31-15-302 (1)(d) and in accordance with the requirements of law, including requirements of law relating to the acquisition and financing of public utilities by municipalities. The question of acquiring or erecting a waterworks need not be so submitted and approved at an election.

All such works or systems authorized by any municipality to be erected by others or the franchise of which is extended or renewed shall be authorized, extended, or renewed upon the express condition that such municipality has the right and power to purchase or condemn any such works or systems at their fair market value at the time of purchasing or condemning such works or systems, excluding all value of the franchise or right-of-way through the streets and also excluding any value by virtue of any contract for hydrant or private rental or otherwise entered into with the municipality in excess of the fair market value of the works or systems. If, after an election conducted in the manner prescribed in section 31-15-302 (1)(d), the municipality is authorized to acquire any of said works or systems after granting a franchise therefor to any person, the municipality shall purchase or condemn such works or systems within the municipal limits then utilized in serving the inhabitants of such municipality at their fair market value. Nothing in this subparagraph (II) shall require such municipality to purchase or condemn all or any part of such works or systems which is obsolete or which has outworn its usefulness.

If the municipality elects to purchase such works or systems and if the parties in interest cannot agree on the purchase price, they shall enter into a written agreement to arbitrate the matter and to abide by the award of the arbitrators, in which event each party shall choose an arbitrator to determine their fair market value. If the two arbitrators cannot agree on the fair market value, they shall choose a third disinterested arbitrator, and the award of any two arbitrators shall be final and binding upon the parties.

Nothing in this paragraph (a) shall authorize the condemnation or purchase of any such works or systems within twenty years after the granting of any franchise therefor, except at periods of ten or fifteen years thereafter, without the consent of the owner of the franchise.

To construct or authorize the construction of such waterworks without their limits and, for the purpose of maintaining and protecting the same from injury and the water from pollution, their jurisdiction shall extend over the territory occupied by such works and all reservoirs, streams, trenches, pipes, and drains used in and necessary for the construction, maintenance, and operation of the same and over the stream or source from which the water is taken for five miles above the point from which it is taken and to enact all ordinances and regulations necessary to carry the power conferred in this paragraph (b) into effect;

To make such grant to inure for a term of not more than twenty-five years when the right to build and operate such water, gas, heating and cooling, or electric light works is granted to a person by said municipality and to authorize such person to charge and collect from each person supplied by them with water, gas, heat, cooling, or electric light such water, gas, heat, cooling, or electric light rent as may be agreed upon between the person building said works and said municipality; and to enter into a contract with the person constructing said works to supply said municipality with water for fire purposes and for such other purposes as may be necessary for the health and safety thereof and also with gas, heat, cooling, and electric light and to pay therefor such sums as may be agreed upon between said contracting parties;

To assess from time to time, when constructing such water, gas, heating and cooling, or electric light works and in such manner as it deems equitable, upon each tenement or other place supplied with water, gas, heat, cooling, or electric light, such water, gas, heat, cooling, or electric light rent as may be agreed upon by the governing body. Gas, heat, cooling, and electric light shall be charged for according to use. At the regular time for levying taxes in each year, said municipality is empowered to levy and cause to be collected, in addition to the other taxes authorized to be levied, a special tax on taxable property in said municipality. Such tax, with the water, gas, heat, cooling, or electric light rents hereby authorized, shall be sufficient to pay the expenses of running, repairing, and operating such works. If the right to build, maintain, and operate such works is granted to a person by a municipality and the municipality contracts with said person for the supplying of water, gas, heat, cooling, or electric light for any purpose, such municipality shall levy each year and cause to be collected a special tax, as provided for in this paragraph (d), sufficient to pay off such water, gas, heat, cooling, or electric light rents so agreed to be paid to said person constructing said works. The tax shall not exceed the sum of three mills on the dollar for any one year.

To condemn and appropriate so much private property as is necessary for the construction and operation of water, gas, heating and cooling, or electric light works in such manner as may be prescribed by law; and to condemn and appropriate any water, gas, heating and cooling, or electric light works not owned by such municipality in such manner as may be prescribed by law for the condemnation of real estate.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1115, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1462, § 1, effective May 16.

L. 81:

(1)(a)(I) and (1)(c) to (1)(e) amended, p. 1455, § 3, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-101 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-15-708. Water and water systems.

The governing body of each municipality has the power:

To construct public wells, cisterns, and reservoirs in the streets and other public and private places within the municipality or beyond the limits thereof for the purpose of supplying the same with water, to provide proper pumps and conducting pipes or ditches, to regulate the distribution of water for irrigating and other purposes, and to levy an equitable and just tax upon all consumers of water for the purpose of defraying the expense of such improvements;

To take water in sufficient quantity, for the purpose provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), from any stream, creek, gulch, or spring in this state. If the taking of such water in such quantity materially interferes with or impairs the vested right of any person residing upon such creek, gulch, or stream or doing any milling or manufacturing business thereon, the governing body shall first obtain the consent of such person or acquire the right of domain by condemnation as prescribed by law and make full compensation or satisfaction for all the damages thereby occasioned to such person.

When it is deemed necessary by any municipality to enter upon or take private property for any of the uses set forth in this section, the property shall be examined and appraised and the damages thereon assessed. The proceedings shall be in all respects the same as provided by articles 1 to 7 of title 38, C.R.S., for the taking of private property for public or private use.

To regulate the water supply used in said municipality for domestic or household purposes and to prohibit and condemn the use of any and all surface wells and the waters thereof for domestic or household purposes when the same are found injurious to the health of said municipality or of the inhabitants thereof;

To supply water from its water system to consumers outside the municipal limits of the municipality and to collect such charges upon such conditions and limitations as said municipality may impose by ordinance.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1117, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

31-15-709. Sewers and sewer systems.

The governing body of each municipality has the power:

To construct and keep in repair culverts, drains, sewers, water mains, and cesspools and to regulate their use; and to assess, either in whole or in part, the cost of the construction of sewers, water mains, and drains upon the lots or lands adjacent to and opposite the improvements in proportion to the frontage of such lots or lands abutting upon the street in which such sewer, water main, or drain is to be laid. The cost of such sewer, water main, or drain at street intersections or crossings shall be wholly paid for by the municipality. The benefit to the public generally, if any, shall be determined by ordinance and shall be assessed against such municipality, and the balance shall be assessed against the lots or lands and the owners thereof according to the frontage.

To establish a system of sewerage and for that purpose to divide the municipality into districts; to impose a special assessment or tax to defray the expense of constructing such sewers upon private property within such district or upon the lots or lands adjacent to or abutting upon the street where said sewer is laid; to compel the owners of any buildings located in said district and on blocks abutting on any established sewer to connect with such sewer; to prohibit the keeping or maintaining of any vault, closet, privy, or cesspool within said district or within four hundred feet of any established sewer; and to regulate the construction, maintenance, and use of all vaults, closets, privies, and cesspools within the municipal limits and not within said prohibited districts or in proximity to an established sewer.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1118, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-12-101 (22) and 31-15-301 (1)(f) as they existed prior to 1975.

31-15-710. Water pollution control.

The governing body of each municipality has the power:

To provide for the cleansing and purification of water, watercourses, and canals and the draining or filling of ponds on private property when necessary to prevent or abate nuisances; and for the purpose of aiding in the prevention and abatement of water pollution all municipalities are authorized:

To apply for and to accept grants or loans or any other aid from the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof under any federal law in force;

To construct, reconstruct, lease, improve, better, and extend sewerage facilities and sewage treatment works wholly within or wholly without the municipality or partially within and partially without the municipality;

To issue its general obligation bonds or other general obligations for said purpose pursuant to and within the limitations prescribed by section 31-15-302 (1)(d) and to issue its revenue bonds or obligations for such purpose pursuant to law;

To provide that such bonds or obligations or any part thereof may be sold to the state of Colorado, the United States, or any agency or instrumentality of either at private sale and without advertisement;

To cooperate with other local public bodies and with state agencies and institutions by contract for the joint construction and financing of sewerage facilities and sewage treatment works and the maintenance and operation thereof;

To enter into joint operating agreements with industrial enterprises and to accept gifts or contributions from such industrial enterprises for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, and extension of sewerage facilities and sewage treatment works. When determined by its governing body to be in the public interest and necessary for the protection of public health, a municipality is authorized to enter into and perform contracts, whether long-term or short-term, with an industrial establishment for the provision and operation by the municipality of sewerage facilities to abate or reduce the pollution of waters caused by discharges of industrial wastes by the industrial establishment and the payment periodically by the industrial establishment to the municipality of amounts at least sufficient, in the determination of such governing body, to compensate the municipality for the cost of providing, including payment of principal and interest charges, if any, and of operating and maintaining the sewerage facilities serving such industrial establishment.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1118, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(a)(VI) amended, (HB 19-1071), ch. 17, p. 62, § 2, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-101 (24) as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1071, see section 1 of chapter 17, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

31-15-711. Other public improvements.

The governing body of each municipality has the power:

To deepen, widen, dock, cover, wall, alter, or change the channel of watercourses;

To establish markets and market houses and provide for the regulation and use thereof. No charge or assessments of any kind shall be levied on any truck or other vehicle, or on the owner thereof, bringing produce or provisions to any of the markets in the municipality, for standing in or occupying a place in any of the marketplaces of the municipality or in the streets contiguous thereto on market days and evenings previous thereto. The governing body has full power to prevent forestalling, to prohibit or regulate huckstering in the markets, and to prescribe the kind and description of articles which may be sold and the stands and places to be occupied by the vendors. The governing body may authorize the immediate seizure, arrest, or removal from the markets of any person violating its regulations as established by ordinance, together with any article of produce in his possession, and additionally may authorize the immediate seizure and destruction of tainted or unsound meat or other provisions.

To establish and operate at public expense municipal slaughterhouses and cold storage plants where animals may be slaughtered at the cost of labor and other necessary expense, held in cold storage, and delivered to the owners or sold. Any municipality establishing and operating such slaughterhouse shall charge a reasonable fee for the slaughter of animals and the storage of meat, and said fees shall be used to pay the necessary expenses of conducting the business.

To provide for and regulate public scales and to require the vendors of coal, hay, and like articles of merchandise, when requested to do so by the purchaser of such articles, to weigh the same upon the public scales before delivering the same to their customer or vendees;

To erect, establish, and maintain public hospitals, medical dispensaries, and other suitable places of relief. No such hospitals, medical dispensaries, or other suitable places of relief shall be established, acquired, or erected by a municipality unless the question is submitted at a regular or special election and approved in the manner provided for authorization of bonded indebtedness by section 31-15-302 (1)(d) and unless such municipality does not have a general licensed medical and surgical hospital in operation within its municipal limits within the twelve months immediately preceding said election.

To provide by ordinance for the construction, maintenance, and operation of public parking facilities, buildings, stations, or lots and to pay for their cost by general tax levy or otherwise or by the issuance of bonds of such municipality, which bonds may be retired by revenues assessed and collected as rentals, fees, or charges from the operation of such facilities or from parking meter rentals or charges;

To develop, maintain, and operate mass transportation systems, either individually or jointly with any government, county, or other political subdivision, pursuant to the provisions of part 2 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S.;

To construct and keep in repair bridges, viaducts, and tunnels and regulate their use and to establish within the municipal limits all toll bridges and ferries, license and regulate the same, and, from time to time, fix tolls thereon;

To construct, maintain, and operate safety measures that are necessary to allow the municipality to restrict the sounding of locomotive horns at highway-rail grade crossings in compliance with 49 U.S.C. sec. 20153, as amended, and the applicable rules of the federal railroad administration. The governing body of the municipality shall construct, maintain, and operate the safety measures in accordance with the provisions of section 40-4-106, C.R.S., and the standards of safety prescribed by the public utilities commission pursuant to section 40-29-110, C.R.S.

To provide in the municipal budget for programs that support education and outreach on environmental sustainability and for financing capital improvements for energy efficiency retrofits and the installation of renewable energy fixtures, as defined in section 30-11-107.3, C.R.S., for private residences and commercial property within the municipality but that do not exempt the municipality from the requirements of any other statute;

To encourage homeowners to participate in utility demand-side management programs where applicable.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1119, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(i) added, p. 348, § 3, effective August 7.

L. 2008:

(1)(j) and (1)(k) added, p. 1299, § 20, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

31-15-711.5. Municipal jails - sanitary standards.

Any municipality that chooses to establish and operate a jail, as authorized in section 31-15-401 (1)(j), that begins operations on or after August 30, 1999, may establish sanitary standards for such jail relating to space requirements, furnishing requirements, required special use areas or special management housing, and environmental condition requirements, including but not limited to standards pertaining to light, ventilation, temperature, and noise level. If a municipality does not adopt standards pursuant to this section, the jail operated by or under contract with the municipality shall be subject to the standards adopted by the department of public health and environment pursuant to section 25-1.5-101 (1)(i), C.R.S. In establishing such standards, the municipality is strongly encouraged to consult with national associations that specialize in policies relating to correctional institutions.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 803, § 3, effective May 24.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 715, § 57, effective July 1.

31-15-712. Public improvements by contract - cities.

All work done by the city in the construction of works of public improvement of five thousand dollars or more shall be done by contract to the lowest responsible bidder on open bids after ample advertisement. It shall be unlawful for any person to divide a works of public improvement construction into two or more separate projects for the sole purpose of evading or attempting to evade the requirement that works of public improvement construction costing five thousand dollars or more be submitted to open bidding, unless the total cost of any such project would be less if divided into two or more projects than if submitted to open bidding as one project. If no bids are received or if, in the opinion of the city council, all bids received are too high, the city may enter into negotiations concerning the contract. No negotiated price shall exceed the lowest responsible bid previously received. The city is not required to advertise for and receive bids for such technical, professional, or incidental assistance as it may deem wise to employ in guarding the interest of the city against the neglect of contractors in the performance of such work.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1120, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1186, § 1, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-15-103 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-15-713. Power to sell public works - real property.

The governing body of each municipality has the power:

To sell and dispose of waterworks, ditches, gasworks, geothermal systems, solar systems, electric light works, or other public utilities, public buildings, real property used or held for park purposes, or any other real property used or held for any governmental purpose. Before any such sale is made, the question of said sale and the terms and consideration thereof shall be submitted at a regular or special election and approved in the manner provided for authorization of bonded indebtedness by section 31-15-302 (1)(d).

To sell and dispose of, by ordinance, any other real estate, including land acquired from the federal government, owned by the municipality upon such terms and conditions as the governing body may determine at a regular or special meeting. With respect to such land acquired from the federal government, which land is located within or contiguous to the municipality, such terms and conditions shall be designed to prevent speculation and assure that benefits accrue to the municipality when the sale or disposition of said land is for municipal expansion or residential purposes. Nothing in this paragraph (b) or in section 31-15-101 (1) shall be construed to invalidate the acceptance of federal land by a municipality or the sale and disposal by a municipality of land acquired from the federal government, where such acceptance or disposal was consummated prior to April 1, 1976, and municipal authority for any such acceptance or disposal is hereby confirmed.

To lease any real estate, together with any facilities thereon, owned by the municipality when deemed by the governing body to be in the best interest of the municipality. Any lease for a period of more than one year shall be by ordinance. Any lease for one year or less than one year shall be by resolution or ordinance.

All leases and deeds of conveyance executed and acknowledged by the proper officers of such municipalities and purporting to have been made pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be deemed prima facie evidence of due compliance with all the requirements of this section.

Any town holding title to any land settled and occupied as the site of such town pursuant to and by virtue of the act of congress entitled "An Act for the relief of the inhabitants of cities and towns upon the public lands.", approved March 2, 1867, 43 U.S.C. sections 718-723, and an act of congress entitled "An Act respecting the limits of reservations for town sites upon the public domain.", 43 U.S.C. sections 725-727, and any amendments thereto may dispose of and convey the title to such land in the manner provided in this section.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1120, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 76:

(1)(b) amended, p. 697, § 2, effective April 6.

31-15-714. Oil and gas leases - unit agreements.

The governing body of each municipality has the power:

To lease any real estate or any interest therein owned by the municipality for oil and gas exploration, development, and production purposes, upon such terms and conditions as may be prescribed and contracted by the governing body in the exercise of its best judgment and as such governing body deems to be in the best interests of the municipality. Any such lease of oil and gas rights shall be for a term not to exceed ten years and as long thereafter as oil or gas is produced and shall provide for a royalty of not less than twelve and one-half percent of all oil or gas produced, saved, and marketed or the equivalent market value thereof, which royalty may be reduced proportionately under appropriate provision in such lease if the interest of the municipality is less than a full interest in the land or oil and gas rights in the land described in such lease. When, in the opinion of the governing body and because of the size, shape, or current use of any tract of real estate owned by said municipality, the best interest of the municipality so requires, any such lease of such tract may provide that no drilling shall be conducted on the land covered thereby, in which case such lease shall be for a term not to exceed ten years and so long thereafter as the municipality may share in royalties payable on account of production of oil or gas from lands adjacent to such tract so leased.

To enter into, on behalf of the municipality, when deemed by the governing body to be in the best interest of the municipality, any agreement providing for the pooling, unitization, or consolidation of acreage covered by any oil and gas lease executed by such municipality with other acreage for oil and gas exploration, development, and production purposes and providing for the apportionment or allocation of royalties among the separate tracts of land included in such unit or pooling agreement on an acreage or other equitable basis and, by such agreement, with the consent of the lessee under such lease, to change any of the provisions of any such lease issued by such municipality, including the term of years for which such lease was originally granted and any drilling requirements contained therein, in order to conform such lease to the terms and provisions of such unit or pooling agreement and to facilitate the efficient and economic production of oil and gas from the unit lands.

All leases of oil and gas or rights therein and all unit agreements relating to or dealing with oil and gas and containing provisions similar to those set forth in this section affecting municipal lands made or entered into by any municipality prior to April 16, 1953, acting by its governing body, are hereby confirmed, validated, and declared to be legal and valid in all respects.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1121, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-104 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-15-715. Legislative declaration concerning landfill gas.

The general assembly hereby declares that landfill gas constitutes a hazard to the health, welfare, and safety of the people of this state, whether such gas has accumulated as a result of a public or private landfill operation, and that the extraction of landfill gas will ameliorate this dangerous condition, and further declares that the development of landfill gas will provide a valuable, alternate energy resource to the citizens of this state. In order to diminish this hazard and utilize this energy resource, the powers of municipalities are hereby expanded to authorize landfill gas exploration, development, and production; the financing thereof; the marketing and sale of landfill gas to any public or private person or entity; and the municipal use thereof for any purpose.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire section added, p. 653, § 5, effective July 1.